Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-314.01
Net profit, defined.

Net profit shall mean the gross profit from the sale of a pickle card unit less the unit cost and allowable expenses incurred by a licensed organization in connection with the sale of a pickle card unit.

Laws 1988, LB 1232, § 13.